test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-njamma_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - njamma: # a-stems # pelikukkodâh merkkejum stuorrâ puustuváin. 
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: njaṃa
    njamma+N+Sg+Acc: njaṃa
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: njaaṃan
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com: njammain
    njamma+N+Ess: njamman
    njamma+N+Par: njammad
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom: njaṃah
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen: njaṃai
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc: njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill: njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc: njammain
    njamma+N+Pl+Com: njaṃaijguin
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: njaṃaittáá
